Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 20 Mail Ballots

17-20-1.
Voting by mail ballot.

The electors of this state who, for any of the reasons set forth in §

17-20-2

, being otherwise qualified to vote, shall have the right to vote, in the manner and time provided by this chapter, in all general and special elections and primaries, including presidential primaries in this state for electors of president and vice-president of the United States, United States senators in Congress, representatives in Congress, general officers of the state, senators and representatives in the general assembly for the respective districts in which the elector is duly qualified to vote, and for any other officers whose names appear on the state ballot and for any city, town, ward, or district officers whose names appear on the respective city or town ballots in the ward or district of the city or town in which the elector is duly qualified to vote, and also to approve or reject any proposition of amendment to the Constitution or other propositions appearing on the state, city, or town ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-1.1.
Declaration of policy.

Those electors who vote by mail are entitled to vote in a manner which reasonably guarantees the secrecy of their ballots. The procedures set forth in this chapter are designed to promote the effective exercise of their rights while safeguarding those voters who utilize the mail ballot process from harassment, intimidation, and invasion of privacy. The procedures are intended to prevent misuse of the electoral system. The provisions of this chapter shall be interpreted to effectuate the policies set forth in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 7; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-2.
Eligibility for mail ballots.

Any otherwise qualified elector may vote by mail ballot in the following circumstances:

An elector, within the State of Rhode Island who is incapacitated to the extent that it would be an undue hardship to vote at the polls because of illness, or mental or physical disability, blindness, or serious impairment of mobility;

An elector who is confined in any hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, rest home, or similar institution, public or private, within the State of Rhode Island;

An elector who will be temporarily absent from the state because of employment or service intimately connected with military operations or who is a spouse or legal dependent residing with that person, or a United States citizen who will be outside of the United States;

An elector who chooses to vote by mail for any reason.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 8; P.L. 1984, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 41; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 41; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-2.1.
Requirements for validity of mail ballot and mail ballot applications.

Any legally qualified elector of this state whose name appears upon the official voting list of the city, town, or district of the city or town where the elector is qualified, and who desires to avail himself or herself of the right granted to him or her by the Constitution and declared in this chapter, may obtain from the local board in the city or town a form prepared by the secretary of state as prescribed in this section, setting forth the elector’s application for a mail ballot or may apply online in accordance with §

17-20-2.3

.

Whenever any person is unable to sign his or her name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, that person shall make his or her mark “X”.

To receive a ballot in the mail, an elector must submit an application in person or by mail, so that it is received by the local board, or received electronically through the portal established by §

17-20-2.3

, not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the twenty-first (21st) day before the day of any election referred to in §

17-20-1

.

In addition to those requirements set forth elsewhere in this chapter, a mail ballot, in order to be valid, must have been cast in conformance with the following procedures:

All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(1)

shall be mailed to the elector at the Rhode Island address provided by the elector on the application. In order to be valid, the voter must affix his or her signature on all certifying envelopes containing a voted ballot.

All applications for mail ballots pursuant to §

17-20-2(2)

must state under oath the name and location of the hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, or similar institution where the elector is confined. All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(2)

shall be delivered to the elector at the hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, or similar institution where the elector is confined.

All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(3)

shall be mailed to the address provided by the elector on the application or sent to the board of canvassers in the city or town where the elector maintains his or her voting residence. In order to be valid, the voter must affix his or her signature on the certifying envelope containing voted ballots. Any voter qualified to receive a mail ballot pursuant to §

17-20-2(3)

shall also be entitled to cast a ballot pursuant to the provisions of United States Public Law 99-410, the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA).

All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(4)

may be mailed to the elector at the address within the United States provided by the elector on the application or sent to the board of canvassers in the city or town where the elector maintains his or her voting residence. In order to be valid, the voter must affix his or her signature on all certifying envelopes containing a voted ballot. In order to be valid, all ballots sent to the elector at the board of canvassers, must be voted in conformance with the provisions of §

17-20-14.2

.

Any person knowingly and willfully making a false application or certification, or knowingly and willfully aiding and abetting in the making of a false application or certification, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be subject to the penalties provided for in §

17-26-1

.

In no way shall a mail ballot application be disqualified if the voter’s circumstances change between the time of making the application and voting his or her mail ballot as long as the voter remains qualified to receive a mail ballot under the provisions of §

17-20-2

. The local board of canvassers shall provide the state board of elections with written notification of any change in circumstances to a mail ballot voter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 9; P.L. 1984, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-2.2.
Requirements for validity of emergency mail ballots.

Any legally qualified elector of this state whose name appears upon the official voting list of the town or district of the city or town where the elector is so qualified is eligible to vote by emergency mail ballot according to this chapter. Within twenty (20) days or less prior to any election, the elector may obtain from the local board an application for an emergency mail ballot or may complete an emergency in-person mail ballot application on an electronic poll pad at the board of canvassers where the elector maintains his or her residence.

The emergency mail ballot application, when duly executed, shall be delivered in person or by mail so that it shall be received by the local board, or received electronically through the portal established by §

17-20-2.3

, not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the last day preceding the date of the election.

The elector shall execute the emergency mail ballot application in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

In addition to those requirements set forth elsewhere in this chapter, an emergency mail ballot, except those emergency mail ballots being cast pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, in order to be valid, must have been cast in conformance with the following procedures:

All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(1)

shall be mailed to the elector at the state of Rhode Island address provided on the application by the office of the secretary of state, or delivered by the local board to a person presenting written authorization from the elector to receive the ballots, or cast in private at the local board of canvassers. In order to be valid, the voter must affix his or her signature on the certifying envelope containing a voted ballot. In order to be valid, all ballots sent to the elector at the board of canvassers must be voted in conformance with the provisions of §

17-20-14

.2.

All applications for emergency mail ballots pursuant to §

17-20-2(2)

must state under oath the name and location of the hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, or similar institution where the elector is confined. All mail ballots issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be delivered to the elector by the bipartisan pair of supervisors, appointed in conformance with this chapter, and shall be voted in conformance with the provisions of §

17-20-14

.

All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(3)

shall be mailed by the office of the secretary of state to the elector at an address provided by the elector on the application, or cast at the board of canvassers in the city or town where the elector maintains his or her voting residence. Any voter qualified to receive a mail ballot pursuant to §

17-20-2(3)

shall also be entitled to cast a ballot pursuant to the provisions of United States Public Law 99-410, the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA).

All mail ballots issued pursuant to §

17-20-2(4)

shall be cast at the board of canvassers in the city or town where the elector maintains his or her voting residence or mailed by the office of the secretary of state to the elector at the address within the United States provided by the elector on the application, or delivered to the voter by a person presenting written authorization by the voter to pick up the ballot. In order to be valid, the voter must affix his or her signature on all certifying envelopes containing a voted ballot. In order to be valid, all ballots sent to the elector at the board of canvassers must be voted in conformance with the provisions of §

17-20-14.2

.

The secretary of state shall provide each of the several boards of canvassers with a sufficient number of mail ballots for their voting districts so that the local boards may provide the appropriate ballot or ballots to the applicants. It shall be the duty of each board of canvassers to process each emergency ballot application in accordance with this chapter, and it shall be the duty of each board to return to the secretary of state any ballots not issued immediately after each election.

Any person knowingly and willfully making a false application or certification, or knowingly and willfully aiding and abetting in the making of a false application or certification, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be subject to the penalties provided for in §

17-26-1

.

An emergency mail ballot application may be completed in person using an electronic poll pad provided by the board of canvassers upon presentation by the voter of valid proof of identity pursuant to §

17-19-24.2

. Upon completion of the poll pad application, the voter shall be provided with a ballot issued by the secretary of state and upon completion of the ballot by the voter, the voter shall place the ballot into the state-approved electronic voting device, provided by the board of elections and secured in accordance with a policy adopted by the board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-2.3.
Online application for mail ballot.

In addition to any other available means of applying for a mail ballot, the secretary of state shall establish and maintain a system through which voters may apply for a mail ballot online.

Applications filed using such system shall be considered filed on the calendar date the application is initially transmitted by the voter through the online mail ballot application system.

A voter shall be able to apply for a mail ballot using the online ballot application system when the voter:

Completes an online mail ballot application form, established by the secretary of state, substantially similar to the paper-based mail ballot application form established by §

17-20-13

;

Affirms, subject to penalty of perjury, by means of electronic or manual signature, that the information contained in the mail ballot application is true; and

Verifies the voter’s identity by providing the voter’s date of birth and a Rhode Island driver’s license number or state identification number.

The portal for mail ballot applications shall be available in any language required by federal or state voting rights laws.

To ensure full, equal, and independent access to all voters with disabilities, the portal for mail ballot applications shall comply with all requirements under Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131-12165, and Web Content Accessibility Guidelines (WCAG) 2.0 compliance level AA.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 6, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 6, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-3.
Definitions.

Wherever used in this chapter, every word importing only the masculine gender is construed to extend to, and include, females as well as males.

Whenever used in this chapter, “bipartisan pairs of supervisors” for primaries means a supervisor representing the endorsed candidates and a supervisor representing a majority of unendorsed candidates, and for nonpartisan elections and primaries means non-partisan pairs of supervisors.

Wherever used in this chapter, “employed outside of the United States” includes any person who is:

Employed by any agency, department, or division of the United States government and who, by reason of that employment, resides outside of the continental United States;

Employed outside the territorial limits of the United States; or

A spouse or dependent residing with persons so employed.

Wherever used in this chapter, “services intimately connected with military operations” includes members of religious groups or welfare agencies assisting members of the armed forces who are officially attached to and serving with the armed forces and their spouses and dependents, and the spouses and dependents of members of the armed forces and of the merchant marine; provided, that the spouses and dependents are residing outside of the state with the members of the armed forces, merchant marine, or members of the religious or welfare agencies.

Whenever a signature is required by a voter in this chapter, “signature” also means the voter’s mark “X” if the person is unable to sign his or her name because of physical incapacity or otherwise.

Whenever used in this chapter, “bipartisan” means not of the same recognized political party.

Whenever used in this chapter, “emergency” voting pursuant to §

17-20-2.2(g)

shall be construed to mean “early” voting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-4.
Exemption from registration.

Any member of the armed forces or of the merchant marine of the United States in active service, any person absent from the state in the performance of “services intimately connected with military operations”, as defined in §

17-20-3(d)

, and any person employed outside of the United States, as defined in §

17-20-3(c)

who, except for registration, would be a qualified elector of this state, shall be exempt during the period of his or her service or employment and for two (2) years thereafter from the registration requirements of the Constitution of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 10.

17-20-5.
Residence of person in service or employed outside of the United States.

The “residence”, as defined in §

17-1-3.1

, of any person immediately prior to the commencement of that person’s active service as a member of the armed forces or of the merchant marine of the United States, or immediately prior to his or her absence from the state in the performance of “services intimately connected with military operations” as defined in §

17-20-3(d)

, or immediately prior to his or her employment outside of the United States as defined in §

17-20-3(c)

, shall, for the purposes of this chapter, continue to be that person’s residence during the time of his or her service and for a period of two (2) years thereafter, unless the person changes his or her residence by registering or by taking other appropriate action to qualify to vote in another city or town within this state or in another state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 10; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 11.

17-20-6.
Alternative methods of voting.

Any qualified elector who is a member of the armed forces or of the merchant marine of the United States, or who is absent from the state in the performance of “services intimately connected with military operations” as defined in §

17-20-3(c)

, and any qualified elector of this state exempt from registration under §

17-20-4

, shall have the right to vote at his or her option during the period of his or her service and for two (2) years thereafter by any one of the following methods:

If the person is present within the state on the day of any election, that person shall have the right to vote in the manner prescribed in chapter 19 of this title, subject to any other provisions of this chapter.

If the person is absent from the state on the day of any election, that person has the right to vote by absentee ballot in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, upon compliance with its provisions.

The elector may cast an official federal absentee ballot federal write-in absentee ballot “FWAB” in accordance with the laws of the United States.

The elector may use the “FWAB” to cast a vote for each federal, state and local office for which he or she is entitled to vote in a general, primary or special election.

The elector may also cast an official state blank ballot issued by the office of the secretary of state in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1.

17-20-6.1.
Alternative methods of voting by citizens covered by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA) and other citizens residing outside the United States.

It is the intent and purpose that the provisions set forth in this section are designed to facilitate the federal mandate of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA), 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.

The Federal Post Card Application (FPCA) may be used as a request for an absentee ballot by:

A member of the armed forces who is absent from the state by reason of being in active service;

Any person absent from the state in performance of “services intimately connected with military operations” as defined in §

17-20-3(d)

;

Any person who is employed outside of the United States as defined in §

17-20-3(c)

; and

Any person who does not qualify under subparagraph (1), (2), or (3) above, but who is a citizen of the United States and absent from the state and residing outside the United States as described in chapter 21.1 of this title.

The single FPCA card shall permit the person to request an absentee ballot for each primary and election through the next general election for federal office or for the time period specified by federal law in which the voter is eligible to vote.

The FPCA card must be received by the local board of canvassers where the person last maintains his or her residence for voting purposes within the time frame for applying for absentee ballots as set forth in this title.

If the FPCA, when used in accordance with this section, is sent by the voter through electronic transmission, it must be sent to the secretary of state and it must be received by the secretary of state by the deadline for applying for absentee ballots as set forth in this title. The secretary of state shall then forward the FPCA to the appropriate local authority who shall immediately certify and return the FPCA to the secretary of state with the notation that the corresponding ballots shall be sent by mail and electronic transmission. The secretary of state shall approve electronically transmitted ballots to and from eligible voters only through a service or solution that meets the following requirements:

The system has had one or more independent security reviews;

Demonstrates the system meets the National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) Cybersecurity Framework guidelines or federal cybersecurity framework guidelines of a successor designated federal agency or organization; and

Approved by the secretary of state.

The ballots sent by electronic transmission shall be returned to the state board by electronic transmission. These ballots will be counted at the state board in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state board.

The voter’s signature on the FPCA does not need to be witnessed or notarized, when the FPCA is submitted as provided in this section.

If a voter is casting a mail ballot received through the use of the FPCA card as provided in this section, the voter’s signature does not need to be witnessed or notarized on the certifying envelope used for the return of the voted mail ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 358, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 10; P.L. 2012, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 188, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 189, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

17-20-6.2.
Designation of single state office to provide information on registration and absentee ballot procedures under the Help America Vote Act.

The secretary of state is designated as the single state office responsible for providing information regarding voter registration procedures and absentee ballot procedures under Section 702 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) [see 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff-1(a) and (b)] and shall be responsible for the coordination of the state of Rhode Island’s responsibilities under that section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 234, § 4.

17-20-7.
Duplication of votes — Methods preferred.

In no event shall more than one vote be cast by any individual for any one office or proposition.

In the event that any person votes in person and also attempts to vote by mail ballot or by an official state blank ballot or an official federal absentee ballot, as the case may be, the mail and the official state blank ballot and the official federal absentee ballot, as the case may be, shall be destroyed and not counted.

In the event that any person casts a mail ballot and an official federal absentee ballot and/or official state blank ballot, the mail ballot shall be counted, but the official federal absentee and/or the official state blank ballot shall be destroyed and not counted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 358, § 1.

17-20-8.
Application for ballot.

Whenever any person is unable to sign his or her name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, that person shall make his or her mark “X”.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter as to time and manner thereof, it shall be the duty of the applicant to cause the mail ballot application or the emergency mail ballot application, as the case may be, to be processed by the local board so that the applicant may receive the ballot, cast it, and cause delivery thereof to be made to the state board not later than eight o’clock (8:00) p.m. on the date of election.

The local board shall maintain a separate list of names and addresses of all applicants and a copy of the list shall be made available for inspection to any person upon request.

Any person knowingly and willfully making a false application or certification or knowingly and willfully aiding and abetting in the making of a false application or certification shall be guilty of a felony.

Voters shall be able to apply for a mail ballot electronically through the voter registration portal established by §

17-20-2.3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 10; P.L. 1984, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-8.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 398, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 261, § 1, effective July 21, 1992.

17-20-9.
Application by permanently disabled or incapacitated voters and nursing home residents.

A voter who is indefinitely confined because of physical illness or infirmity or is disabled for an indefinite period or who is a long-term resident in a nursing home, may, by signing an affidavit to that effect, request that a mail ballot application be sent to him or her automatically for every election. The affidavit form and instructions shall be prescribed by the secretary of state, and furnished upon request to any elector by each local board of canvassers. The envelope containing the mail ballot application shall be clearly marked as not forwardable. If any elector is no longer indefinitely confined or is no longer residing in a nursing home, he or she shall notify the clerk of the local board of canvassers of this fact. The clerk shall remove the name of any voter from the mailing list established under this section upon receipt of reliable information that a voter no longer qualifies for the service. The voter shall be notified of the action within five (5) days after the board takes the action.

The affidavit form and instructions prescribed in this section shall be mailed to the applicant along with a stamped return envelope addressed to the local boards of canvassers. The secretary of state may process applications pursuant to this section through the online mail ballot application portal established by §

17-20-2.3

.

For purposes of this section, “nursing home” refers to facilities defined and licensed by the department of health. “Long-term” excludes any residents temporarily residing in such a facility for rehabilitation.

The secretary of state shall maintain a list in the central voter registration system of all voters who automatically receive applications for mail ballots, pursuant to this section.

[Expires December 31, 2025.] Eligible disabled voters shall be entitled to electronically receive and return their mail ballot, using the same electronic transmission system as that used by voters covered by the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (UOCAVA). This electronic process shall satisfy the federal Rehabilitation Act, section 508 concerning accessibility standards.

[Expires December 31, 2025.] For purposes of this section, “eligible disabled voter” means a disabled person eligible to vote who is incapacitated to such an extent that it would be an undue hardship to vote at the polls because of illness, mental or physical disability, blindness, or a serious impairment of mobility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 11; P.L. 1988, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 188, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 189, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

17-20-9.1.
Application by member of the armed forces in active service.

A voter who is a member of the armed forces in active service may, by certification to that effect by the voter’s civilian or military commander or noncommissioned officer in charge of the particular duty station, require that an absentee ballot application be sent to the voter automatically for every election during the period of time for which the voter has been assigned to that duty station. The certification by the civilian or military commander or noncommissioned officer in charge of the particular duty station shall be prepared in form by the secretary of state and shall include the name of the military personnel, the address to which the voter’s application shall be mailed, the name and signature of the military or civilian commander or noncommissioned officer completing the certification, and the expected date of reassignment or discharge of that service person from that duty station.

Notification of removal from the mailing list shall be sent to the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 210, § 1.

17-20-9.2.
Application by member of the armed forces in active service registered to vote using the federal postcard application (FPCA).

A voter who is a member of the armed forces in active service may, by certification to that effect by the voter’s civilian or military commander or noncommissioned officer in charge of the particular duty station, require that an absentee ballot be sent to the voter automatically if that voter has registered to vote using the federal postcard application (FPCA), for every election during the period of time for which the voter has been assigned to that duty station. The certification by the civilian or military commander or noncommissioned officer in charge of the duty station may be prepared in form by the secretary of state and shall include the name of the military personnel, the address to which the voter’s application shall be mailed, the name and signature of the military or civilian commander or noncommissioned officer completing the certification, and the expected date of reassignment or discharge of that service person from that duty station.

Notification of removal from the mailing list shall be sent to the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 210, § 1.

17-20-9.3.
Application by a civilian employed by the United States government and residing outside of the continental United States.

A voter who is employed by any agency, department, or division of the United States government who by reason of that employment resides outside of the continental United States may, by certification to that effect by the voter’s employer, require that an absentee ballot be sent to the voter automatically if that voter has registered to vote using the federal post card application (FPCA), for every election during the period of time for which the voter will reside outside of the continental United States. The certification by the employer shall be prepared in form by the secretary of state and shall include the name of the civilian employee, the address to which the voter’s application shall be mailed, the name and signature of the employer completing the certification, and the length of time for which the individual will reside outside of the continental United States by reason of his or her employment.

Notification of removal from the mailing list shall be sent to the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 390, § 1.

17-20-10.
Certification of applications — Issuance of ballots — Marking of lists — Mailing address.

Upon receipt of the application, the local board shall immediately examine it and determine whether it complies with each of the requirements set forth by this chapter and compare the signature on the ballot application with the signature contained on the original registration card or on the central voter registration system, except as may be otherwise provided by law, to satisfy itself that the applicant is a qualified voter. Upon determining that it does meet each requirement of this chapter and that the signature appears to be the same, the local board shall mark the application “accepted” and record in the space provided on the ballot application the senatorial, representative, and voting district in which the applicant should vote.

The local board shall also record the city or town code and district information in the mailing label section of the mail ballot application. The local board shall also print or type the name of the elector and the complete mailing address in that section. If the local board does not accept the application, the local board shall return the application to the elector, together with a form prescribed by the secretary of state, specifying the reason or reasons for the return of the application.

Not later than 4:00 p.m. on the eighteenth (18th) day before the day of any election referred to in this chapter or within seven (7) days of receipt by the local board, whichever occurs first, the local board shall certify the applications to the secretary of state through the central voter registration system as this procedure is prescribed by the secretary of state. Upon the certification of a mail ballot application to the secretary of state, the local board shall enter on the voting list the fact that a mail ballot application for the voter has been certified and shall cause the delivery of the certified mail ballot applications together with the signed certified listing thereof in sealed packages to the state board of elections.

Upon the ballots becoming available, the secretary of state shall immediately issue and mail, by first-class mail, postage prepaid, a mail ballot to each eligible voter who has been certified. With respect to voters who have applied for these mail ballots under the provisions of §

17-20-2(1)

, the secretary of state shall include with the mail ballots a stamped, return envelope addressed to the board of elections.

The secretary of state shall include on the mail ballot envelope a numerical or alphabetical code designating the city or town where the voter resides. The secretary of state shall immediately thereafter indicate on the voter’s record that the secretary of state has sent mail ballots; provided that this mark shall serve solely to indicate that a mail ballot has been issued and shall not be construed as voting in the election.

Prior to each election, the secretary of state shall also furnish to the chairperson of the state committee of each political party a list of the names and residence addresses of all persons to whom mail ballots have been issued. The secretary of state shall also furnish to a candidate for political office, upon request, a list of the names and residence addresses of all persons to whom mail ballots have been issued within his or her district.

If a ballot is returned to the secretary of state by the postal service as undeliverable, the secretary of state shall consult with the appropriate local board to determine the accuracy of the mailing address, and the secretary of state shall be required to remail the ballot to the voter using the corrected address provided by the local board. If the local board is unable to provide a different address than that to which the ballot was originally mailed, the ballot shall be reissued by the secretary of state to the board of canvassers in the city or town where the voter resides utilizing the numerical or alphabetical code established in subsection (d) of this section. The board shall then attempt to notify the voter at his or her place of residence that the ballot has been returned as undeliverable. The ballot must be voted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The acceptance of a mail ballot application by the board of canvassers and the issuance of a mail ballot by the secretary of state shall not create any presumption as to the accuracy of the information provided by the applicant or as to the applicant’s compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Any inaccuracy in the provided information or irregularity in the application may be raised as a challenge to the ballot before the board of elections at the time of certification. If the challenge raised at that time is meritorious, the ballot shall be voided.

Within two (2) business days of receipt by the local board, the board shall certify emergency mail ballot applications and shall cause the delivery of the emergency mail ballot applications, and certification sheet in sealed packages to the state board of elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 12; P.L. 1984, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 466, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 119, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 57, § 1, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 58, § 1, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-10.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 309, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch, 121, § 3, effective January 1, 2002. For present comparable provisions, see §

17-20-6.1

.

17-20-10.2.
Official state blank ballots.

In the event the official ballot is not available for issuance and mailing forty-five (45) days before a general, primary, or special election, persons applying for a mail ballot under subdivision

17-20-2(3)

and persons applying for a mail ballot through the use of the Federal Post Card Application (FPCA) shall be issued an official state blank ballot forty-five (45) days before the election. Additionally, the voter shall be sent the official ballot immediately upon the ballots becoming available. The office of secretary of state shall be responsible for the arrangement, preparation, printing and distribution of the official state blank ballots. The secretary of state shall also be responsible for all accompanying candidate listings to the extent that information is available, instruction sheets, and envelopes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 358, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1.